tex/context/patterns/lang-cz.pat
z4nal
z3ne.
z3nic
z3no
z3nu
z3ny
z3n[eacute]
z3n[ecaron]
z4n[ecaron]l
z3n[iacute]
z4n[iacute]t
z4n[iacute]v
z3n[yacute]
zo4tr
zo4[scaron]k
2z2p
z3pt
z4p[aacute]t
3zrak
2z1s2
2zt
ztros3
z4tr[aacute]
z3t[rcaron]
3zu.
zu3mo
zu3m[ecaron]
zu3m[iacute]
zu3[scaron]
z2v
zva4d
z3va[rcaron]
z3vi
zvik4
zv4n[ecaron]
z3vod
z3voj
z4von
zv4ro
z4v[aacute]n
z4v[ecaron]s
z3v[iacute]j
3zy.
2zz
z[aacute]1
z[aacute]h2
z[aacute]4kl.
3z[aacute]p
z[aacute]3s2
z[aacute]3z
z[aacute][scaron]2
2z[ccaron]
z3[ccaron]l
2z[ncaron]
z2[rcaron]
z[rcaron]ej3
z3[rcaron]ez
z3[rcaron]e[scaron]
2z[scaron]2
z3[scaron]k
z[scaron]4ka
z3[scaron]t
2z2[uacute]1
z[uacute]3[ccaron]
z[uacute]3[zcaron]
z[uring]3s
[aacute]1b
[aacute]2bl
[aacute]b4ry
[aacute]4b[rcaron].
[aacute]3cho
[aacute]c3ti3
[aacute]1d
[aacute]2dl
[aacute]do4s
[aacute]dos4ti
[aacute]d1[rcaron]
[aacute]1ha
[aacute]3he
[aacute]h1l
[aacute]3hl.
[aacute]h3n
[aacute]1ho
[aacute]1hr
[aacute]1h[aacute]
[aacute]1j
[aacute]4jmu
[aacute]j4m[uring]
[aacute]4kli
[aacute]k4ni
[aacute]1la
[aacute]1le
[aacute]1lo
[aacute]1lu
[aacute]1ly
[aacute]3l[eacute]
[aacute]1l[iacute]
[aacute]3my
[aacute]3m[eacute]
[aacute]1m[ecaron]
[aacute]3m[iacute]
[aacute]3m[yacute]
[aacute]ne4v
[aacute]1ra
[aacute]1re
[aacute]r2m
[aacute]1ro
[aacute]1ru
[aacute]3r[uring]
[aacute]1s
[aacute]2sc
[aacute]2s3k
[aacute]s4k.
[aacute]s4kl
[aacute]s4kn
[aacute]2sla
[aacute]s4ly
[aacute]2sm
[aacute]s4po
[aacute]2st
[aacute]t3k
[aacute]t1r
[aacute]1tu
[aacute]1ty
[aacute]1t[iacute]
[aacute]3t[yacute]
[aacute]v4si
[aacute]v4s[iacute]
[aacute]z3k
[aacute]z3ni
[aacute]zni4c
[aacute]z4vi
[aacute]2[ncaron]
[aacute]1[rcaron]
[aacute][rcaron]4ke
[aacute][rcaron]4k[uring]
[aacute]2[scaron]
[aacute]3[scaron]e
[aacute]3[scaron][iacute]
2[ccaron].
1[ccaron]a
[ccaron]a4br
2[ccaron]b
2[ccaron]1c
1[ccaron]e
3[ccaron]e.
[ccaron]e1c
[ccaron]es3k
1[ccaron]i
2[ccaron]k
[ccaron]3ka.
[ccaron]3ko
[ccaron]3ku
[ccaron]3ky
2[ccaron]1m
2[ccaron]n
[ccaron]2ne
1[ccaron]o
[ccaron]2p
2[ccaron]s
[ccaron]1sk
[ccaron]s4la
[ccaron]s4sr
2[ccaron]2t
[ccaron]4ten[eacute].
[ccaron]4ten[yacute]
[ccaron]t4la
[ccaron]4tov[yacute].
3[ccaron]tv
4[ccaron]t[ecaron]n
[ccaron]3t[iacute]
1[ccaron]u
1[ccaron][aacute]
1[ccaron][iacute]
[ccaron][iacute]s3l
1[ccaron][uring]
2[dcaron].
1[dcaron]a
1[dcaron]o
[dcaron]s4te
2[dcaron]1t
3[dcaron]uj
[eacute]1
[eacute]2d
[eacute]3di
[eacute]3do
[eacute]2f
[eacute]3fo
[eacute]f1r
[eacute]2kl
[eacute]2l
[eacute]2m
[eacute]3ma
[eacute]3me
[eacute]3mi
[eacute]3mo
[eacute]3mu
[eacute]3m[uring]
4[eacute]re.
[eacute]2s
[eacute]2t
[eacute]3ta
[eacute]3to
[eacute]3t[aacute]
[eacute]2[scaron]
[eacute]2[zcaron]
[ecaron]1c
[ecaron]d3r
[ecaron]3ha
[ecaron]3he
[ecaron]3hl.
[ecaron]h3lo
[ecaron]h3n
[ecaron]1ho
[ecaron]3hu
[ecaron]3h[uring]
[ecaron]3ja
[ecaron]1je
[ecaron]1jo
[ecaron]3j[uring]
[ecaron]4kl[eacute]
[ecaron]3k2t
[ecaron]1l
[ecaron]1ra
[ecaron]ra3d
[ecaron]1re
[ecaron]1ro
[ecaron]r3s
[ecaron]rs4t
[ecaron]1ru
[ecaron]1ry
[ecaron]1r[uring]
[ecaron]s3k
[ecaron]s3n
[ecaron]t1a3
[ecaron]t4ac
[ecaron]t1l
[ecaron]1tr
[ecaron]t3ra
[ecaron]4traj
[ecaron]t3v
[ecaron]1t[iacute]
[ecaron]t3[rcaron][iacute]
[ecaron]2v
[ecaron]3va
[ecaron]3ve
[ecaron]3vl
[ecaron]3vo
[ecaron]3vu
[ecaron]3v[aacute]
[ecaron]v3[ccaron]
[ecaron]2z
[ecaron]3ze
[ecaron]3zi
[ecaron]z3n
[ecaron]3zo
[ecaron]3z[iacute]
[ecaron]1[rcaron]
[ecaron]2[scaron]
[ecaron]3[scaron]e
[ecaron]3[scaron]i
[ecaron]3[scaron]o
[ecaron]3[scaron]u
[ecaron]3[scaron][aacute]
[ecaron]3[scaron][iacute]
[ecaron][scaron]3[tcaron]
[ecaron][scaron]4[tcaron]s
[ecaron]2[tcaron]
[ecaron]3[tcaron]o
[ecaron]2[zcaron]
[ecaron]3[zcaron]e
[ecaron]3[zcaron]i
[ecaron]3[zcaron]o
[ecaron]3[zcaron]u
[ecaron]3[zcaron][iacute]
[iacute]1b
[iacute]b3[rcaron]
[iacute]3cho
[iacute]ch4t
[iacute]d1l
[iacute]1h
[iacute]2hl
[iacute]h3n
[iacute]1j
[iacute]jed4
[iacute]j4m[uring]
[iacute]2kr
[iacute]1l
[iacute]1m[aacute]
[iacute]3m[eacute]
[iacute]1m[ecaron]
[iacute]1r
[iacute]1sa
[iacute]2s3k
[iacute]s4kl
[iacute]s4kn
[iacute]s4l.
[iacute]s3le
[iacute]s4ln
[iacute]s[aacute]h2
[iacute]1t
[iacute]t3k
[iacute]3t3[rcaron]e
[iacute]z3da
[iacute]z3de
[iacute]z3k
[iacute]3zna
[iacute]3z3ni
[iacute]3zn[ecaron]n
[iacute]2[ncaron]
[iacute]1[rcaron]
[iacute]2[scaron]
[iacute]3[scaron]e
[iacute]3[scaron]i
[iacute]3[scaron]o
[iacute]3[scaron][iacute]
1[ncaron]
2[ncaron].
2[ncaron]a
[ncaron]a3d
2[ncaron]k
2[ncaron]m
3[ncaron]ov
[ncaron]1s
2[ncaron]1t
[oacute]1
[oacute]2z
[oacute]3za
[oacute]3zi
[oacute]3zo
[oacute]3zy
2[rcaron].
[rcaron]a4pl
[rcaron]a4[dcaron]m
2[rcaron]2b
2[rcaron]c
2[rcaron]d
[rcaron]e3ch
[rcaron]e4dob
[rcaron]e1h
[rcaron]e3jd
[rcaron]e3kl
[rcaron]e3kv
[rcaron]e4k[rcaron][iacute]
[rcaron]eo4r
[rcaron]e3p2
[rcaron]e4p.
[rcaron]e4pk
[rcaron]e4p[ccaron]
[rcaron]er4v
2[rcaron]es
[rcaron]e3ska
[rcaron]e3sko
[rcaron]e2sp
[rcaron]es3po
[rcaron]e4sr
[rcaron]e3sta
[rcaron]e3stu
[rcaron]e3st[aacute]
[rcaron]e3st[rcaron]
[rcaron]e3tl
[rcaron]et4[rcaron]
[rcaron]e3zd
[rcaron]e3zk
4[rcaron]ezl
[rcaron]e3[ccaron]t
[rcaron]i1
[rcaron]ia3
[rcaron]i3h
[rcaron]i4h.
[rcaron]i4hn
[rcaron]i4j[dcaron]
[rcaron]i4l.
[rcaron]i4lb
[rcaron]il2n
4[rcaron]ine
[rcaron]is2
3[rcaron]i4t.
[rcaron]i4v.
[rcaron]i4vk
[rcaron]i4vn
[rcaron]i3z
[rcaron]i[ccaron]4t
[rcaron]i3[rcaron]
[rcaron]i4[scaron].
2[rcaron]k
[rcaron]2kl
[rcaron]k4la
[rcaron]k4li
[rcaron]k4ly
[rcaron]k4no
2[rcaron]1l
2[rcaron]1m
2[rcaron]n
1[rcaron]o
2[rcaron]ou
2[rcaron]2p
2[rcaron]1s
[rcaron]s4to
2[rcaron]1t
[rcaron]2v
2[rcaron]z
[rcaron][aacute]4pl
[rcaron][aacute]2sl
2[rcaron]1[ccaron]
2[rcaron][iacute]d
[rcaron][iacute]4k[rcaron]
[rcaron][iacute]1s
2[rcaron][scaron]
[rcaron]3[scaron]t
[rcaron][scaron]4ti
1[scaron]
2[scaron].
[scaron]ab3
[scaron]a4vl
2[scaron]1c
[scaron]ej4d
[scaron]ep3t
[scaron]i4mr
2[scaron]2k
[scaron]3ka
[scaron]3ke
[scaron]3k3li
4[scaron]3kou
4[scaron]kov
3[scaron]kr
[scaron]k4ro
[scaron]3ku.
[scaron]3ky
2[scaron]l
[scaron]2la
[scaron]2li
[scaron]3liv
[scaron]2lo
[scaron]l[aacute]2
[scaron]2l[eacute]
[scaron]2l[yacute]
2[scaron]1m
[scaron]mi4d
2[scaron]n
[scaron]2p
2[scaron]1s
2[scaron]t
[scaron]4tip
[scaron]t4ka
[scaron]t4kl
[scaron]4t[ecaron]k
[scaron]2t[ecaron]s
[scaron]4t[ecaron]v
[scaron]4t[iacute]p
[scaron]2v
[scaron][iacute]3d
[scaron]2[ncaron]
[scaron]3[scaron][iacute]
2[scaron]2[tcaron]
[scaron]3[tcaron]o
[scaron]3[tcaron]u
[scaron]3[tcaron][aacute]
1[tcaron]
2[tcaron].
3[tcaron]al
2[tcaron]k
2[tcaron]m
2[tcaron]t
[tcaron][aacute][ccaron]4k
1[uacute]
[uacute]2c2
[uacute]2d
[uacute]j4ma
[uacute]2k
[uacute]2l
[uacute]2n
[uacute]2p
[uacute]2t
[uacute]t4ko
[uacute]2v
[uacute]2z
[uacute]z3k
[uacute]2[ccaron]
3[uacute][ccaron]e
[uacute][rcaron]e4z
[uacute][scaron]4ti
[uacute]2[zcaron]
[uring]1b
[uring]1c
[uring]1hl
[uring]3jd
[uring]4jmov[yacute]
[uring]1le
[uring]1my
[uring]1m[ecaron]
[uring]1ra
[uring]r4va
[uring]r4vy
[uring]1s2
[uring]2st
[uring]s3te
[uring]s3t[aacute]n
[uring]t2
[uring]3tkl
[uring]2v
[uring]3va
[uring]3vo
[uring]3v[ecaron]
[uring]2z
[uring]3zo
[uring]2[zcaron]
[uring]3[zcaron]e
[uring]3[zcaron]i
[uring]3[zcaron]o
[yacute]1b
[yacute]3cho
[yacute]1d
[yacute]d4la
[yacute]1h
[yacute]1j
[yacute]1l
[yacute]1ml
[yacute]1m[ecaron]
[yacute]2n
[yacute]3no
[yacute]po3[ccaron]4
[yacute]1r
[yacute]1s2
[yacute]2sk
[yacute]1t
[yacute]t4ku
[yacute]t4ky
[yacute]1u
[yacute]4vli
[yacute]3zk
[yacute]3zn
[yacute]4zvu
[yacute][ccaron]4n[ecaron]
[yacute]1[rcaron]
[yacute][scaron]3l
1[zcaron]
2[zcaron].
[zcaron]a3d
[zcaron]a4tv
3[zcaron]a[ccaron]
2[zcaron]1b
2[zcaron]1c
2[zcaron]1d
[zcaron]e2b3
[zcaron]eh3n
[zcaron]e4ml
[zcaron]e4zg
[zcaron]i4dl
[zcaron]i4jm
3[zcaron]il
[zcaron]i2vl
2[zcaron]k
[zcaron]k4ni
2[zcaron]l
[zcaron]4lic
3[zcaron]lo
2[zcaron]1m
2[zcaron]n
[zcaron]on2
2[zcaron]1s2
2[zcaron]1t
[zcaron]2v
[zcaron][aacute]4br
[zcaron][aacute]4nr
2[zcaron][dcaron]
[zcaron][iacute]4zn
2[zcaron][ncaron]
2[zcaron][scaron]
[zcaron][scaron]4ti
[zcaron][scaron]4t[ecaron]
}

% end pattern data
